Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska60-4,169
Revocation; when.

Whenever
it comes to the attention of the director that any person when operating a
motor vehicle has, based upon the records of the director, been convicted
of or administratively determined to have committed an offense for which disqualification
is required pursuant to section 60-4,146.01, 60-4,168, or 60-4,168.01, the
director shall summarily revoke (1) the commercial driver's license or CLP-commercial learner's permit and
privilege of such person to operate a commercial motor vehicle in this state
or (2) the privilege, if such person is a nonresident, of operating a commercial
motor vehicle in this state. Any revocation ordered by the director pursuant
to this section shall commence on the date of the signing of the order of
revocation or the date of the release of such person from the jail or a Department
of Correctional Services adult correctional facility, whichever is later,
unless the order of the court requires the jail time and the revocation to
run concurrently.

Laws 1989, LB 285, § 119;

Laws 1993, LB 31, § 19;

Laws 1993, LB 420, § 12;

Laws 1996, LB 323, § 12;

Laws 2001, LB 38, § 37;

Laws 2010, LB805, § 9;

Laws 2014, LB983, § 50.